Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
Public Contracts for Purchase of Meat
[Repealed]

§§ 31-7-75 through 31-7-83.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 312, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§31-7-75. [Laws, 1988, ch. 501, § 1].

§31-7-77. [Laws, 1988, ch. 501, § 2].

§31-7-79. [Laws, 1988, ch. 501, § 3].

§31-7-81. [Laws, 1988, ch. 501, § 4].

§31-7-83. [Laws, 1988, ch. 501, § 5].